Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Sections 2 to 6 of this 2025 Act are added to and made a part of ORS 459A.700
to 459A.744.
SECTION 2. (1) To expand  and enhance alternative redemption access opportunities for
individuals who redeem empty beverage containers on a daily or near daily basis, the Oregon
Liquor and  Cannabis Commission may approve one or more alternative access redemption
centers at which any person may return empty beverage containers  and receive payment of
the refund value. An alternative access redemption center  approved under this section must
be:
(a) Established and  operated by a nonprofit organization that has entered into an agree-
ment with a distributor cooperative to be a sponsor of the alternative access redemption
center; and
(b) Located within a city having a population greater than 500,000.
(2) Application for approval of an alternative access redemption center shall be filed with
the commission. The  application shall state the name and address of the nonprofit organ-
ization responsible for the establishment and operation of the alternative access redemption
center, the name and address of the sponsoring distributor cooperative,  the kind of empty
beverage containers that will be accepted at  the alternative access redemption center, the
names and addresses of the dealers to be served by the alternative access redemption center
and a proposal for the convenience zone specified by the commission under section  3 of this
2025 Act. The application shall  include such additional information as the commission may
require.
(3) The commission shall approve an alternative access  redemption center if it finds the
redemption center will provide  alternative redemption access opportunities for individuals
who redeem empty beverage containers on a daily or near daily basis. The order of the
commission approving an alternative access redemption center shall state:
(a) The location of the convenience zone specified by the commission under section  3 of
this 2025 Act;
(b) The dealers within the  convenience zone to be served by the alternative access re-
demption center;
(c) The dealers within the convenience zone not to be served by  or not participating in
the alternative access redemption center;
Enrolled Senate Bill 992 (SB 992-A) Page 1
(d) The services  to be provided by the alternative access redemption center and the
equivalent services required to be provided  under section 3 of this 2025 Act by a dealer that
does not participate in, and is not served by, the alternative access redemption center;
(e) The kind of empty beverage containers  that the alternative access redemption center
must accept;
(f) Whether the alternative access redemption center will be located in an area zoned for
commercial or industrial use under state statute or local ordinance or will be located in  an
area that will  provide more convenient service given the proximity of the location to the
dealers within the convenience zones to be served by the redemption center; and
(g) Such  other provisions to ensure that the alternative access redemption center will
provide alternative  redemption access opportunities for individuals who redeem empty
beverage containers on a daily or near daily basis.
(4) An alternative access redemption center approved by the commission under this sec-
tion is not a recycling depot for purposes of ORS 90.318,  459A.007, 459A.010, 459A.050 or
459A.080.
(5)(a) No later than five days  after approving an alternative access redemption center
under subsection (3) of this section, the commission shall  provide written notice to each
dealer that is identified in the order approving  the alternative access redemption center as
a dealer  within the convenience zone not to be served by or not participating in the alter-
native access redemption center.
(b) The notice required under this subsection shall include:
(A) All information required to be in the order approving  the alternative access re-
demption center under subsection (3) of this section; and
(B) Notice of the provisions of section 3  of this 2025 Act that are applicable to the dealer
receiving the notice.
(6) The commission may review at any time approval of an alternative  access redemption
center. After written  notice to the persons responsible for the establishment and operation
of the alternative access redemption center, and to the dealers served  by the alternative
access redemption center, the  commission may, after hearing, withdraw approval of an al-
ternative access redemption center if the commission finds there  has not been compliance
with its order approving the alternative access redemption center, or if  the alternative ac-
cess redemption center no longer provides alternative redemption access opportunities for
individuals who redeem empty beverage containers on a daily or near daily basis.
(7) An alternative access redemption center:
(a) May not refuse to accept and to pay the refund value of up to  350 individual empty
beverage containers, as established by ORS 459A.705, returned  by any one person during one
day;
(b) Must provide hand counting of up to 50 individual empty beverage containers returned
by any one person during one day for the refund value established by ORS 459A.705;
(c) May provide  drop off service for at least 125 individual empty beverage containers
returned by any one person during one day for the refund  value established by ORS 459A.705,
and may  provide an accounting mechanism by which the person may redeem the refund
value of the beverage containers at a later date; and
(d) May provide other services as determined necessary  by the person that operates the
alternative access redemption center.
(8)(a) In  addition to the alternative access redemption center approved by the commis-
sion under subsection (3) of this section, a person that operates an  alternative access re-
demption center, with the support of the sponsoring distributor cooperative, may apply  to
the commission for approval of one or more  mobile or satellite redemption sites. The com-
mission may approve a mobile or satellite redemption site if the commission determines  that
the site will provide convenient alternative redemption  access opportunities for individuals
Enrolled Senate Bill 992 (SB 992-A) Page 2
who redeem empty beverage containers on a daily or near daily basis.  A mobile or satellite
redemption site must:
(A) Maintain consistent service hours and  days at fixed points within the convenience
zone specified for the mobile or satellite redemption site; and
(B) Provide the refund value of beverage containers in cash at the time of redemption.
(b) At the time of approving a  mobile or satellite redemption site, the commission may
specify a convenience zone  in the area surrounding a mobile or satellite redemption site as
provided in section 3 of this 2025 Act.
(c) Nothing in this subsection prohibits the operator of  an alternative access redemption
center from offering additional redemption services outside of the area of an alternative  ac-
cess convenience zone or a mobile or satellite convenience zone.
(d) The commission may establish by rule  standards for the operation of mobile or sat-
ellite redemption sites and requirements for  dealers located in a convenience zone applicable
to a mobile or satellite redemption site.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission shall specify a convenience
zone for an alternative  access redemption center and a convenience zone for a mobile or
satellite redemption site as provided in this section. The convenience zone specified for:
(a) An  alternative access redemption center shall be a contiguous area, the boundaries
of which do not exceed three and one-half miles from the location of the alternative access
redemption center at any point.
(b) A mobile or satellite redemption site shall be located within an area that extends from
the outer edge of  the convenience zone specified for the alternative access redemption center
with which the satellite or mobile redemption site is associated to a boundary that is no
more than five miles from the alternative access redemption center at any point.
(2) All dealers doing business within a  convenience zone specified under this section that
occupy a space of 5,000 or more square feet in a  single area may participate in, be served
by and be charged the cost of participation in the alternative access redemption center and,
if such  a dealer participates in, is served by and pays the cost of participation in the alter-
native access redemption center, the dealer may, notwithstanding any other provision  of
ORS 459A.700 to 459A.744, refuse to  accept and to pay the refund value of empty beverage
containers.
(3)(a) All dealers doing business within the convenience zone that occupy a space  of less
than 5,000 square feet in a single area  may, notwithstanding any other provision of ORS
459A.700 to 459A.744, refuse to accept and  to pay the refund value of more than 24 individual
empty beverage containers returned by any one person during one day.
(b) Notwithstanding ORS 459A.715, the requirement to accept and pay the refund  value
of beverage containers described in this subsection applies during the hours  of 8 a.m. and 6
p.m. while the dealer is otherwise open for business.
(4)(a) Any dealer, other than a dealer that operates a dealer redemption  center, doing
business within a convenience zone specified under this section  that occupies a space of 5,000
or more square feet in a single area that does  not participate in, and is not served by, the
alternative access redemption center may not refuse to accept and to pay  the refund value
of up to 350 individual empty beverage  containers, as established by ORS 459A.705, returned
by any one person during one day and must, beginning on the date that  the alternative ac-
cess redemption center begins accepting beverage  containers, provide services equivalent to
those provided by the alternative access redemption center under section 2 of this 2025  Act,
including hand counting and drop off service.
(b) In addition to complying  with the requirements specified in paragraph (a) of this
subsection, a dealer described in paragraph (a) of this subsection must:
(A) Post  in each area where beverage containers are received a clearly visible and legible
sign that contains the list of services that must be provided by the dealer; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 992 (SB 992-A) Page 3
(B) Provide two automated reverse vending machines capable  of processing metal, plastic
and glass beverage containers,  or one automated reverse vending machine capable of proc-
essing metal, plastic and glass beverage containers  for each 500,000 beverage containers sold
by the dealer in the previous calendar year, whichever is greater.
(c)(A) The provisions of paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection do not apply to a dealer
described in paragraph (a) of this subsection if the dealer sold fewer than 100,000  beverage
containers in the previous calendar year. To be eligible for the exemption under this para-
graph, the dealer must report to the commission the number of beverage containers  sold by
the dealer in the previous calendar year.
(B) The report required under this paragraph must be submitted by the dealer:
(i) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, no later than 60 days after issu-
ance of the notice required under section 2 (5) of this 2025 Act; and
(ii) No later than January 1 of each calendar year following the year that the  notice un-
der section 2 (5) of this 2025 Act was issued and for which the dealer intends to claim the
exemption.
(d) The commission shall ensure compliance with  this subsection by a dealer described
in paragraph (a) of this subsection that is not subject to an exemption under paragraph (c)
of this subsection.
(5) A dealer that plans to  begin doing business within a convenience zone specified under
this section after the date that  the alternative access redemption center associated with the
convenience zone begins accepting beverage containers shall, not less than 60  days prior to
the date that the dealer begins doing business:
(a) Provide notice to  the commission explaining whether the dealer will or will not par-
ticipate in,  be served by and pay the cost of participation in the alternative access redemp-
tion center; and
(b) If  the dealer will not participate in the alternative access redemption center and will
claim an exemption under subsection  (4)(c) of this section, provide documentation of com-
pliance with the requirements  for nonparticipating dealers under this section and an esti-
mate of the number of beverage containers that the dealer expects to sell during  the first
calendar year that the dealer does business within the convenience zone.
SECTION 4.
(1)(a) The  Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission shall classify the two
existing convenience zones specified under ORS 459A.738 for a full-service redemption center
as a single low-impact convenience zone if:
(A) In the prior year, the combined volume of beverage container returns to all dealers
that occupy a space of 5,000 or more square  feet in the second convenience zone specified
under ORS 459A.738 (1) is  less than three percent of the annual returns to the redemption
center; and
(B)(i) The redemption center has been in operation for a period of three years; or
(ii) The person that  operates the redemption center demonstrates to the satisfaction of
the commission that the redemption center has been  in operation for a sufficient period of
time to allow the beverage container return volumes for the redemption  center and dealers
described in paragraph (a)(A) of this subsection to normalize at a consistent rate.
(b) The commission shall classify two existing convenience zones as one low-impact con-
venience zone:
(A) As a result of the review required under section 5 of this 2025 Act; or
(B) Upon the approval of an application for classification submitted by  an operator of a
full-service redemption center.
(2) All dealers doing business within a low-impact  convenience zone that occupy a space
of 5,000 or more square feet in a  single area may participate in, be served by and be charged
the cost of participation in the full-service redemption  center and, if such a dealer partic-
ipates in, is served by and pays the cost of participation in the full-service redemption  cen-
Enrolled Senate Bill 992 (SB 992-A) Page 4
ter, the dealer  may, notwithstanding any other provision of ORS 459A.700 to 459A.744, refuse
to accept and to pay the refund value of empty beverage containers.
(3) All dealers doing business within a low-impact  convenience zone that occupy a space
of less than 5,000 square feet in a single area may, notwithstanding any other provision of
ORS 459A.700 to 459A.744, refuse to accept and to pay the refund value of more than 24 in-
dividual empty beverage containers returned by any one person during one day.
(4) The requirements of ORS 459A.738 (5) and  the exemption provided for in ORS 459A.738
(5)(c) shall continue to apply to a dealer described in ORS 459A.738 (5)(a) doing business
within a convenience zone that has been classified as a low-impact convenience zone.
(5) A dealer that plans to begin  doing business within a low-impact convenience zone
shall, not less than 60 days prior to the date that the dealer begins doing business:
(a) Provide notice to the commission explaining whether the dealer will or  will not par-
ticipate in, be served by and  pay the cost of participation in the full-service redemption
center; and
(b) If the dealer will not participate  in the redemption center and will claim an exemption
under ORS 459A.738 (5)(c), provide documentation of compliance with the requirements  for
nonparticipating dealers under ORS 459A.738 (5)(c) and an estimate of the  number of
beverage containers that the dealer expects to  sell during the first calendar year that the
dealer does business within the low-impact convenience zone.
SECTION 5.
(1) No less than once every three years, the Oregon Liquor and  Cannabis
Commission shall review each convenience zone specified under ORS 459A.738  and each low-
impact convenience zone. The review must include consultation with:
(a) The distributor cooperative;
(b) Participating dealers within the convenience zone; and
(c) If the boundary of  the convenience zone is less than three and one-half miles from
the redemption center, dealers that  would be within the convenience zone if the boundary
of the convenience zone were extended to three and one-half miles.
(2) In conducting the review, the commission shall consider whether:
(a) Any convenience zones specified  under ORS 459A.738 should be classified as a low-
impact convenience zone; and
(b) Any convenience zone specified under ORS 459A.738 should have its  boundary ex-
panded.
SECTION 6.
No later than January 1, 2026, the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission,
in consultation with the distributor cooperative and an association representing retail
grocers, shall review each convenience zone and classify as a low-impact convenience  zone
any convenience zone that meets the criteria specified in section 4 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 459A.700 is amended to read:
459A.700. As used in  ORS [ 459.992 (3) and (4) and ] 459A.700 to 459A.744, unless the context re-
quires otherwise:
(1) “Alternative access redemption center” means a redemption center that meets  the
requirements of section 2 of this 2025 Act.
[(1)] (2) “Beverage” means a fluid described in ORS 459A.702.
[(2)] (3) “Beverage container” means a container described in ORS 459A.702.
[(3)] (4) “Commission” means the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission.
[(4)] (5) “Consumer” means every person who purchases a beverage  in a beverage container for
use or consumption.
[(5)] (6)  “Dealer” means every person in this state who engages in the sale of beverages  in
beverage containers to a consumer, or means a  full-service redemption center approved under ORS
459A.735.
[(6)] (7)  “Dealer redemption center” means a location that meets the requirements of ORS
459A.741, at which any person may return empty beverage containers in bulk and [ receive payment
of] access  the refund value of the beverage containers  through an accounting mechanism that
Enrolled Senate Bill 992 (SB 992-A) Page 5
is accessible on the premises and that makes the refund  value available no later than one
week after the person drops off the beverage containers .
[(7)] (8)  “Distributor” means every person  who engages in the sale of beverages in beverage
containers to a dealer in this state including any manufacturer who engages in such sales.
[(8)] (9) “Full-service redemption center” means a location  that meets the requirements of ORS
459A.737, at which any person may return empty beverage containers and receive payment  of the
refund value of the beverage containers.
[(9)] (10)  “Hard seltzer” means any sugar-based  alcoholic beverage that contains carbonated
water or any malt-based alcoholic  beverage that contains carbonated water and is not a malt
beverage, as defined in ORS 471.001.
[(10)] (11)  “Importer” means any dealer or manufacturer who directly imports beverage  con-
tainers into this state.
[(11)] (12)  “In this  state” means within the exterior limits of the State of Oregon and includes
all territory within these limits owned by or ceded to the United States of America.
[(12)] (13)  “Kombucha” means  a fermented beverage that is made from tea and contains not
more than 21 percent of alcohol by volume.
(14) “Low-impact convenience zone” means a  convenience zone specified under section 4
of this 2025 Act.
[(13)] (15)  “Manufacturer” means every person  bottling, canning or otherwise filling beverage
containers for sale to distributors, importers or dealers.
[(14)] (16)  “Place of business of a dealer” means the  location at which a dealer sells or offers
for sale beverages in beverage containers to consumers.
[(15)] (17) “Redemption center” means  a full-service redemption center , [or] a dealer redemption
center  or an alternative access redemption center .
[(16)] (18)  “Use or consumption” includes the exercise of any right or power over  a beverage
incident to the ownership thereof, other than the sale or the keeping  or retention of a beverage for
the purposes of sale.
[(17)] (19) “Water and flavored  water” means any beverage identified through the use of letters,
words or symbols on its product label as a type of water.
[(18)] (20) “Wine” has the meaning  given that term in ORS 471.001, except that “wine” does not
mean hard seltzer or kombucha.
SECTION 8.  ORS 459A.715 is amended to read:
459A.715. (1) A dealer may refuse to accept from any person,  and a distributor or importer may
refuse to accept from a dealer, any empty beverage container that  does not state thereon a refund
value as established by ORS 459A.705.
(2) A dealer may refuse to accept and to pay the refund value of:
(a) Empty beverage containers if the place of business of  the dealer and the kind of empty
beverage containers are  included in an order of the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission ap-
proving a full-service redemption center under ORS 459A.735.
(b) Empty beverage containers, if the dealer  occupies a space of more than 5,000 square
feet and the dealer participates in, is served by and pays the cost of participation in:
(A) A full-service redemption center, if  the dealer’s place of business is located in a
low-impact convenience zone; or
(B) An alternative access redemption center.
(c) Empty beverage containers at a location where the dealer has established  a dealer
redemption center within the limits of a city with a population of 500,000 or greater.
[(b)] (d)  Any  beverage container visibly containing or contaminated by a substance other than
water, residue of the original contents or ordinary dust.
[(c)(A) ] (e)(A)  More than 144 individual beverage  containers returned by any one person during
one day, if the dealer occupies a space of 5,000 or more square feet in a single area.
(B) More than 50 individual beverage containers returned by any one person during one day, if
the dealer occupies a space of less than 5,000 square feet in a single area.
Enrolled Senate Bill 992 (SB 992-A) Page 6
[(d)] (f)  Any beverage container that is damaged to the extent that the brand  appearing on the
container cannot be identified.
(3) The commission shall develop and provide to dealers notices that describe  the reasons a
dealer may refuse to accept  and to pay the refund value for empty beverage containers under sub-
section (2) of this section. The notices may contain additional information as determined by the
commission.
(4) A dealer must post in each area where beverage containers are received a notice  provided
to the dealer under subsection (3) of this section.
(5) A dealer required to accept and pay the refund value  of beverage containers under
the provisions of ORS 459A.700 to 459A.744 must accept and pay the refund value  of beverage
containers during the hours of 8 a.m. to 8 p.m. while the dealer is otherwise open for busi-
ness. A dealer may  refuse to accept the return of beverage containers during all other hours.
(6) A dealer that holds a winery license under ORS  471.223 may, at the premises of the
winery, refuse to accept and to pay the refund value of  any empty beverage container that
is of a kind, size and brand that the dealer does not sell at the winery.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 459A.735 is amended to read:
459A.735. (1) To facilitate the  return of empty beverage containers and to serve dealers of
beverages, any person may establish a full-service redemption center, subject  to the approval of the
Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission, at which any person may return empty beverage con-
tainers and receive payment of the refund value of such beverage containers.
(2) Application for approval of a  full-service redemption center shall be filed with the commis-
sion. The application shall state the name and  address of the person responsible for the establish-
ment and operation of the full-service redemption center, the kind of beverage  containers that will
be accepted at the full-service redemption center, the names and addresses of the dealers  to be
served by the full-service redemption center and proposals for up  to two convenience zones de-
scribed in ORS 459A.738. The application shall include such additional  information as the commis-
sion may require.
(3) The commission shall approve a full-service redemption center  if it finds the redemption
center will provide a convenient service to persons for the return of empty beverage  containers.
The order of the commission approving a full-service redemption center shall state:
(a) The location of the convenience zones specified by the commission under ORS 459A.738 (1);
(b) The dealers within  the convenience zones to be served by the full-service redemption center;
(c) The dealers within the convenience zones not to be served by or not  participating in the
full-service redemption center;
(d) The services to be provided by the redemption center  and the equivalent services required
to be provided under ORS 459A.738 (5) by  a dealer that does not participate in, and is not served
by, the full-service redemption center;
(e) The kind of empty beverage containers that the full-service redemption center must accept;
(f) Whether the full-service redemption center will be located in an area zoned  for commercial
or industrial  use under state statute or local ordinance or will be  located in an area that will
provide  more  convenient service given the proximity of the location to the dealers within the con-
venience zones to be served by the full-service redemption center; [ and]
(g) That the applicant has  notified the state Senator and state Representative in whose
districts the full-service redemption  center will be located of the proposed full-service re-
demption center and the applicant’s plan for community engagement; and
[(g)] (h)  Such other provisions to  ensure that the full-service redemption center will provide a
convenient service to the public as the commission may determine.
(4) A full-service redemption center approved by the commission  under this section is not a re-
cycling depot for purposes of ORS 90.318, 459A.007, 459A.010, 459A.050 or 459A.080.
(5)(a) No later than five days  after approving a full-service redemption center under subsection
(3) of this section, the commission shall  provide written notice to each dealer that is identified in
Enrolled Senate Bill 992 (SB 992-A) Page 7
the order approving the full-service  redemption center as a dealer within the convenience zones not
to be served by or not participating in the full-service redemption center.
(b) The notice required under this subsection shall include:
(A) All information required  to be in the order approving the full-service redemption center
under subsection (3) of this section; and
(B) Notice of the provisions of ORS 459A.738 that are applicable to the  dealer receiving the
notice.
(6) The commission may review at any time approval of a full-service redemption center.  After
written notice to the person responsible for  the establishment and operation of the full-service re-
demption center,  and to the dealers served by the full-service redemption center, the commission
may, after hearing, withdraw  approval of a full-service redemption center if the commission finds
there has not been compliance with its order approving the full-service redemption center,  or if the
full-service redemption center no longer provides a convenient service to the public.
(7) The commission shall provide the opportunity  for public comment before concluding
under subsection (3) or (6) of  this section that a full-service redemption center provides a
convenient service  to the public for the redemption of beverage containers. The commission
may consider  public comment when determining whether a full-service redemption center
provides a convenient service to consumers for the return of empty beverage containers.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 459A.741 is amended to read:
459A.741. (1) Any person may establish a dealer redemption center , as provided in this section,
to serve [ one or more dealers ] a dealer.  [ doing business in an  area that is not part of a convenience
zone specified by the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission under ORS 459A.738. ]
(2) Notwithstanding any  other provision of ORS 459A.700 to 459A.744, a dealer redemption
center must:
(a) Provide secure drop  off service at no charge for empty beverage containers to be returned
by any person for the refund value established by ORS 459A.705 in a bag or other bulk return con-
tainer sold for that purpose;
(b) Provide an  accounting mechanism by which a person may redeem the refund value of
beverage  containers  returned in bulk [ either immediately in cash from a dealer participating in the
dealer redemption center or no later than one week after the beverage containers are dropped off ] and
access the refund value of the  beverage containers through an accounting mechanism that
is accessible on the premises and that  makes the refund value available no later than one
week after the person drops off the beverage containers ;
(c) Be serviced  by a distributor cooperative for purposes of transporting and processing re-
deemed beverage containers;
(d) Be  available for persons to return beverage containers to the dealer redemption center dur-
ing any time that a participating dealer is open between the hours of 8 a.m. and 8 p.m.; and
(e) Be of a sufficient capacity to  provide convenient service to the public as the commission may
determine.
(3) A dealer  redemption center may provide services other than those specified in subsection (2)
of this section as determined necessary by the person responsible for operation of the  dealer re-
demption center.
(4) A distributor cooperative that services dealer redemption centers shall:
(a) Provide notice to the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission no later than 14 days after
the date that a dealer redemption center:
(A) Begins providing drop off  service to persons for the return of empty beverage containers;
or
(B) Ceases operations; and
(b) Annually provide to the commission the names and  addresses of the dealers served by all
dealer redemption centers serviced by  the distributor cooperative, and such additional information
as the commission may require.
Enrolled Senate Bill 992 (SB 992-A) Page 8
(5)(a) A dealer that participates in, is served by and pays the cost of  participation in a dealer
redemption center may, notwithstanding any  other provision of ORS 459A.700 to 459A.744, refuse to
accept and to pay the refund value of  more than 24 individual empty beverage containers returned
by any one person during one day.
(b) If a dealer redemption center is established in a  city having a population of less than 10,000
people, the  Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission shall specify a dealer redemption center con-
venience zone. The dealer redemption center convenience zone shall be  the sector within a radius
of not more than one mile around  the dealer redemption center. Any dealer doing business within
a dealer redemption center convenience zone may participate in, be served by and pay the  cost of
participation in the dealer redemption center and receive the benefit provided for  in paragraph (a)
of this subsection.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, a dealer  that establishes a dealer
redemption center at the dealer’s location within  the limits of a city with a population
greater than 500,000 may refuse to accept and to pay the refund value  of empty beverage
containers at that location.
SECTION 11.  ORS 459A.720 is amended to read:
459A.720. (1) Every beverage  container sold or offered for sale in this state by a dealer shall
clearly indicate by embossing or  by a stamp, or by a label or other method securely affixed to the
beverage container, the refund value of the container.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to glass beverage containers  designed for
beverages having a brand name permanently marked thereon which, on  October 1, 1972, had a re-
fund value of not less than five cents.
(3) No person shall sell  or offer for sale at retail in this state any metal beverage container so
designed and constructed that a  part of the container is detachable in opening the container without
the aid of a can opener.
(4) On or after March 1, 1979, no person shall sell or offer for  sale at retail in this state, in
addition to beverages as defined in ORS  459A.700 [ (1)], any beverage in liquid form intended for
human consumption in any beverage container so  designed and constructed that a metal part of the
container is detachable in opening the container through use of  a metal ring or tab without the aid
of a can opener. However, nothing in this subsection shall prohibit the sale of a container the  only
detachable part of which is a piece of pressure sensitive tape.
(5) No person shall sell or offer for  sale at retail in this state metal beverage containers con-
nected to each other  by a separate holding device constructed of plastic rings or other material
which will not decompose by photobiodegradation, chemical degradation, or biodegradation  within
120 days of disposal.
SECTION 12.  ORS 459A.863 is amended to read:
459A.863. As used in ORS 459A.860 to 459A.975:
(1) “Brand”  means any mark, word, name, symbol, design, device or graphical element, or a
combination thereof, including a registered or unregistered trademark,  that identifies a product and
distinguishes the product from other products.
(2) “Commingled recycling” means the recycling or recovery of  two or more materials that are
mixed together and that generally would be  separated into individual materials at a commingled
recycling processing facility in order to be marketed.
(3)(a) “Commingled recycling processing facility” means a facility that:
(A) Receives source separated commingled recyclable materials that are collected  commingled
from a collection program providing the opportunity to recycle; and
(B) Separates the recyclable materials described in subparagraph (A) of this  paragraph into
marketable commodities or  streams of materials that are intended for use or further processing by
others.
(b) “Commingled recycling processing facility” does not include:
(A) Scrap metal recycling facilities;
(B) Scrap automotive or appliance recycling facilities;
Enrolled Senate Bill 992 (SB 992-A) Page 9
(C) Full-service redemption centers , [ or] dealer  redemption centers  or alternative access re-
demption centers, as those terms are defined in ORS 459A.700, and  recycling facilities owned and
operated by a distributor cooperative established under ORS 459A.718;
(D) Recycling facilities handling covered electronic devices, as defined in ORS 459A.305;
(E) Recycling processing  facilities that process only noncommingled, source separated recyclable
material from commercial entities;
(F) Recycling processing facilities that recover commingled recyclable material primarily  from
the construction and demolition debris waste stream;
(G) Recycling depots;
(H) Recycling reload facilities; or
(I) Limited sort facilities, as defined by rule by the Environmental Quality Commission.
(4) “Contaminant” means:
(a) A material set out for recycling collection that is not  properly prepared and on the list of
materials accepted for recycling collection by a recycling collection program; or
(b) A material shipped to  a recycling end market that is not accepted or desired by that end
market.
(5) “Contamination” means the  presence of one or more contaminants in a recycling collection
or commodity stream  in an amount or concentration that negatively impacts the value of the mate-
rial or negatively impacts a processor’s ability to sort that material.
(6)(a) “Covered product” means:
(A) Packaging;
(B) Printing and writing paper; and
(C) Food serviceware.
(b) “Covered product” does not include:
(A) A beverage container, as defined in ORS 459A.700.
(B) Bound books.
(C) Napkins, paper towels or other paper intended to  be used for cleaning or the absorption of
liquids.
(D) Rigid pallets used as the structural foundation for transporting goods lifted by a forklift,
pallet jack or similar device.
(E) Specialty  packaging items that are used exclusively in industrial or manufacturing processes,
including but not limited to:
(i) Cores and wraps for rolls of packaging  sold by a mill to a packaging converter or food
processor; and
(ii) Trays, whether designed for a single use or multiple uses, used for the  transport of compo-
nent parts from a parts supplier to a manufacturer that assembles those parts.
(F) Liquified petroleum gas containers that are designed to be refilled.
(G) A material that the producer demonstrates is exempt under ORS 459A.869.
(H) Pallet wrap or similar packaging used to secure a palletized load if added by  a person that
is not the producer of the palletized covered products.
(I) Packaging related  to containers for architectural paint, as defined in ORS 459A.822, that has
been collected by a producer responsibility organization under the program established under  ORS
459A.820 to 459A.855.
(J) Any item that is not ultimately discarded  inside this state, whether for purposes of recovery
or disposal.
(K) Items sold on a farm or used on a farm, including  items used for farm use, as defined in ORS
215.203, or for processing on a farm, provided that an item used on a farm is not subsequently  sold
at a retail establishment that is not located on a farm.
(L) Items used by a nursery licensed under ORS 571.055  that generates the majority of the
nursery’s revenue through the  sale of nursery stock, as defined in ORS 571.005, provided that the
items are not sold through retail sales.
(M) Packaging and paper products sold or supplied in connection with:
Enrolled Senate Bill 992 (SB 992-A) Page 10
(i) Prescription drugs as defined in ORS 689.005;
(ii) Nonprescription drugs as defined in ORS 689.005;
(iii) Drugs marketed under a brand name as defined in ORS 689.515; or
(iv) Drugs marketed under a generic name as defined in ORS 689.515.
(N) Packaging and paper products sold or  supplied in connection with drugs that are used for
animal medicines, including but not limited to parasiticide drugs for animals.
(O) Packaging and paper products sold or supplied in connection with:
(i) Infant formula as defined in 21 U.S.C. 321(z);
(ii) Medical food as defined in 21 U.S.C. 360ee(b)(3); or
(iii) Fortified oral  nutritional supplements used for individuals who require supplemental or sole
source nutrition to  meet nutritional needs due to special dietary needs directly related to cancer,
chronic kidney disease, diabetes, malnutrition, or failure to thrive, as those terms  are defined as by
the International Classification of Diseases, Tenth Revision,  or other medical conditions as deter-
mined by the commission.
(P) Wine and spirit containers for which a refund value is established under Oregon law.
(Q) Packaging for products:
(i) That are required under 40 C.F.R. 156.140, or other federal regulation  pertaining to toxic or
hazardous materials, to state on the label or container that the packaging should  not be recycled
or should be disposed of in a manner other than recycling; or
(ii) Identified by the commission  by rule as product that is required by law to state on the label
or container that the packaging should not be recycled or should be disposed of  in a manner other
than recycling.
(R) Any other material, as determined by  the commission by rule, after consultation with the
Oregon Recycling System Advisory Council.
(7) “Food serviceware” means paper or plastic plates, wraps, cups, bowls,  pizza boxes, cutlery,
straws, lids, bags, aluminum foil or clamshells or similar containers:
(a) That are generally intended for single use; and
(b) That are sold to a retailer or  a dine-in food establishment or a take-out food establishment,
regardless  of  whether the item is used to prepackage food for resale, is filled on site for food ordered
by a customer or is resold as is.
(8) “Large producer” means  a producer that is among the 25 largest producers of covered pro-
ducts based on market share.
(9) “Licensee” means a person  that is licensed by a brand and manufactures a covered product
or a packaged item under that brand.
(10) “Litter” means waste that is improperly placed so as  to be a nuisance or aesthetic, health
or environmental concern.
(11) “Local government” means:
(a) A city;
(b) A county; or
(c) A metropolitan service district.
(12) “Local government’s service provider” means:
(a) A collection service franchise holder under ORS 459A.085;
(b) Any person authorized by  a city or county to provide recycling collection services described
in subsection (25)(a) to (d) of this section; or
(c) Any person  authorized by a metropolitan service district to provide recycling collection
services described in subsection (25)(d) of this section.
(13) “Market share” means a producer’s percentage of all  covered products sold in or into this
state during a specified  time period, as calculated in accordance with methods established by the
commission by rule.
(14) “Mechanical recycling” means a form of recycling that does not  change the basic molecular
structure of the material being recycled.
Enrolled Senate Bill 992 (SB 992-A) Page 11
(15) “Metropolitan service district” means a metropolitan service district  established under ORS
chapter 268.
(16) “Nonprofit organization” means an organization or group of organizations  described in
section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code that is exempt from  income tax under section 501(a)
of the Internal Revenue Code.
(17) “Opportunity to recycle” has the meaning given that term in ORS 459A.005.
(18)(a) “Packaging” means:
(A) Materials used for the containment or protection of products, including but  not limited to
paper, plastic, glass or metal or a mixture thereof;
(B) Single-use bags, including but not limited to shopping bags; and
(C) Nondurable materials used  in storage, shipping or moving, including but not limited to
packing materials, moving boxes, file boxes and folders.
(b) “Packaging” does not include:
(A) Food serviceware; or
(B) Sharps, as defined in ORS 459.386.
(19) “Person” has the meaning given that term in ORS 459.005.
(20) “Printing and writing paper” includes, but is not  limited to, newspaper, magazines, flyers,
brochures, booklets, catalogs,  telephone directories and paper used for copying, writing or other
general use.
(21) “Processor” means a person that owns or operates a commingled recycling processing  fa-
cility.
(22) “Producer” means a person  that is determined to be the producer of a covered product
under ORS 459A.866.
(23) “Producer responsibility organization”  means a nonprofit organization established by a
producer or group of producers to administer a producer responsibility program.
(24) “Producer responsibility  program” means a statewide program for the responsible manage-
ment of covered products that  is administered by a producer responsibility organization pursuant to
a plan approved by the Department of Environmental Quality under ORS 459A.878.
(25) “Recycling collection” means the act or process of gathering recyclable materials by:
(a) On-route residential collection from the generator at the place of generation;
(b) On-site nonresidential collection from the generator at the place of generation;
(c) Multifamily on-route residential collection from each multifamily  dwelling that has five or
more units;
(d) Recycling depots at a  disposal site or another designated location that is more convenient
to the population being served and expanded depots as described in ORS 459A.007; or
(e) Other collection methods included in an approved producer responsibility program plan.
(26) “Recycling  depot” means a location where recyclable materials are accepted from the public
or commercial businesses and transported to a location for processing or to an end market.
(27) “Recycling reload facility” means a facility other than a recycling depot where recyclable
materials are received, consolidated and made ready for  transport to another location for processing
or to a responsible end market.
(28) “Recycling system” means all aspects of the programs and participants that  have a role in
Oregon’s statewide recycling structure, including  producers of products sold in or into Oregon,
generators of recyclable materials, governments that regulate  materials management programs,
businesses that collect and process recyclable materials and  persons that receive recyclable mate-
rials to convert to new feedstock or products.
(29) “Responsible end market” means a materials market in  which the recycling or recovery of
materials or the disposal of contaminants is conducted in a way  that benefits the environment and
minimizes risks to public health and worker health and safety.
(30) “Responsible management” means the handling, tracking and disposition of covered  pro-
ducts from the point of collection through the final destination of  the collected material in a way
that benefits the environment and minimizes risks to public health and worker health and safety.
Enrolled Senate Bill 992 (SB 992-A) Page 12
(31) “Responsible recycling” means the handling of covered  products for recycling and removal
of contaminants by a certified or permitted processor and disposition to a responsible end market.
(32) “Small producer” means a producer that:
(a) Is a nonprofit organization;
(b) Is a public body, as defined in ORS 174.109;
(c) Has a gross revenue of less than $5 million for the organization’s most recent fiscal year;
(d) Sold in or into Oregon less  than one metric ton of covered products for use in this state in
the most recent calendar year;
(e) Is a manufacturer of a beverage sold in a beverage container, as those terms  are defined in
ORS 459A.700, that sold in or into Oregon less than five metric tons of covered products,  including
but not limited to secondary and tertiary  packaging for beverage containers, for use in this state in
the most recent calendar year;
(f)(A) Is a restaurant, food  cart or similar business establishment that primarily sells to members
of the public food that is generally intended to be consumed immediately and  without the need for
further preparation, either on or off the premises; and
(B) Is not a producer of food serviceware as described in ORS 459A.866; or
(g) Operates a single retail sales establishment,  has no online sales and is not supplied or op-
erated as part of a franchise or a chain.
(33) “Specifically identified  material” means a material or covered product identified by the de-
partment under ORS 459A.917.
(34) “Uniform statewide collection list” means the list of materials established in  accordance
with the requirements of ORS 459A.914 (4).
SECTION 13.
(1) Sections 2 and 3 of this  2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 459A.735
by section 9 of this 2025 Act become operative on October 1, 2025.
(2) The Oregon Liquor and  Cannabis Commission may take any action before the opera-
tive date  specified in subsection (1) of this section necessary to enable the commission to
exercise, on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this  section, all of the
duties, functions and powers conferred on the commission by sections 2  and 3 of this 2025
Act and the amendments to ORS 459A.735 by section 9 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 14. The amendments to ORS 459A.735  by section 9 of this 2025 Act apply to
applications for approval of a full-service redemption  center filed with the Oregon Liquor and
Cannabis Commission on or after the operative date specified in  section 13 (1) of this 2025
Act.
SECTION 15. Notwithstanding section 2 (8)  of this 2025 Act, the Oregon Liquor and
Cannabis Commission may not accept  an application to operate a mobile or satellite re-
demption site before January 1, 2026.
SECTION 16. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 992 (SB 992-A) Page 13
Passed by Senate April 17, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 21, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 992 (SB 992-A) Page 14